District of Columbia statutes.
46-306.15

Jurisdiction to modify child-support order of foreign country or political subdivision.

(a)

If a foreign country or political subdivision that is a state will not or may not modify its order pursuant to its laws, a tribunal of the District may assume jurisdiction to modify the child-support order and bind all individuals subject to the personal jurisdiction of the tribunal whether or not the consent to modification of a child-support order otherwise required of the individual pursuant to § 46-306.11 has been given or whether the individual seeking modification is a resident of the District or of the foreign country or political subdivision.

(b)

An order issued pursuant to this section is the controlling order.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 615
as added June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(f)(11), 53 DCR 3634

Section References

This section is referenced in § 46-302.01, § 46-306.10, and § 46-306.11.

Effective Dates

Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 615 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).